apertium-eng-kaz.eng.dix
    <pardef n="step__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l/>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>s</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ped</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ped</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ping</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ping</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ping</l>
        <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="st/ick__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ick</l>
        <r>ick<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ick</l>
        <r>ick<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>icks</l>
        <r>ick<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>uck</l>
        <r>ick<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>uck</l>
        <r>ick<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>icking</l>
        <r>ick<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>icking</l>
        <r>ick<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>icking</l>
        <r>ick<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="str/ike__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ike</l>
        <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ike</l>
        <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ikes</l>
        <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>uck</l>
        <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>uck</l>
        <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>iking</l>
        <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>iking</l>
        <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>iking</l>
        <r>ike<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="sw/ell__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ell</l>
        <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ell</l>
        <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ells</l>
        <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>elled</l>
        <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>elled</l>
        <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e r="LR" i="">
      <p>
        <l>ollen</l>
        <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>elling</l>
        <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>elling</l>
        <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>elling</l>
        <r>ell<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="sw/im__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>im</l>
        <r>im<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>im</l>
        <r>im<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>ims</l>
        <r>im<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>am</l>
        <r>im<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>um</l>
        <r>im<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>imming</l>
        <r>im<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>imming</l>
        <r>im<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>imming</l>
        <r>im<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <pardef n="t/each__vblex">

                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>each</l>
        <r>each<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>each</l>
        <r>each<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eachs</l>
        <r>each<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>aught</l>
        <r>each<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>aught</l>
        <r>each<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eaching</l>
        <r>each<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eaching</l>
        <r>each<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


                            <e i="">
      <p>
        <l>eaching</l>
        <r>each<s n="vblex"/><s n="subs"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    </pardef>

                            <e lm="stop" i=""><i>stop</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="strike" i=""><i>str</i><par n="str/ike__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="strip" i=""><i>strip</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="swim" i=""><i>sw</i><par n="sw/im__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="teach" i=""><i>t</i><par n="t/each__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="tap" i=""><i>tap</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="tip" i=""><i>tip</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="top" i=""><i>top</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="trap" i=""><i>trap</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="snap" i=""><i>snap</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="wrap" i=""><i>wrap</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="drop across" i=""><i>drop</i><par n="step__vblex"/><p><l><b/>across</l><r><g><b/>across</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="stick to" i=""><i>st</i><par n="st/ick__vblex"/><p><l><b/>to</l><r><g><b/>to</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="drop by sometime" i=""><i>drop</i><par n="step__vblex"/><p><l><b/>by<b/>sometime</l><r><g><b/>by<b/>sometime</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="drop by" i=""><i>drop</i><par n="step__vblex"/><p><l><b/>by</l><r><g><b/>by</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="stop feeling dizzy" i=""><i>stop</i><par n="step__vblex"/><p><l><b/>feeling<b/>dizzy</l><r><g><b/>feeling<b/>dizzy</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="slap" i=""><i>slap</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="teach to read and write" i=""><i>t</i><par n="t/each__vblex"/><p><l><b/>to<b/>read<b/>and<b/>write</l><r><g><b/>to<b/>read<b/>and<b/>write</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="crap" i=""><i>crap</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="hop" i=""><i>hop</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="unship" i=""><i>unship</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="drop" i=""><i>drop</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="equip" i=""><i>equip</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="kidnap" i=""><i>kidnap</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="pop" i=""><i>pop</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="rip" i=""><i>rip</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="ship" i=""><i>ship</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="slip" i=""><i>slip</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="stick" i=""><i>st</i><par n="st/ick__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="step" i=""><i>step</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="step into" i=""><i>step</i><par n="step__vblex"/><p><l><b/>into</l><r><g><b/>into</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="stop" i=""><i>stop</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="strike" i=""><i>str</i><par n="str/ike__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="strip" i=""><i>strip</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="swim" i=""><i>sw</i><par n="sw/im__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="teach" i=""><i>t</i><par n="t/each__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="tap" i=""><i>tap</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="tip" i=""><i>tip</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="top" i=""><i>top</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="trap" i=""><i>trap</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="snap" i=""><i>snap</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="wrap" i=""><i>wrap</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="drop" i=""><i>drop</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="trip" i=""><i>trip</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="lap" i=""><i>lap</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="flap" i=""><i>flap</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="snap" i=""><i>snap</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="dip" i=""><i>dip</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm="dip into" i=""><i>dip</i><par n="step__vblex"/><p><l><b/>into</l><r><g><b/>into</g></r></p></e>
                            <e lm="strap" i=""><i>strap</i><par n="step__vblex"/></e>
